Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 1. Declaration of Rights
Inclusion of defendant's belongings in an inventory search of an impounded car was proper because neither reasonable suspicion nor probable cause were required, and defendant's contention that his baggage should have been released to him prior to the inventory would defeat the purpose of the inventory search. Defendant did not request his belongings prior to the inventory search, and even if he had, the officer was not required to provide them until after the contents were inventoried.
Johnson v. State, 2006 WY 79, 137 P.3d 903,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 2006).

Inventory search of defendant's vehicle was proper because the court found that an officer had custody of defendant's vehicle after his arrest, and that the trooper did not act in bad faith because he inventoried the vehicle in anticipation of impounding it; no one was available to take possession of the car after defendant was arrested, and the inventory was complete by the time defendant's father arrived.
Hunnicutt-Carter v. State, 2013 WY 103, 308 P.3d 847,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 2013).

When warrantless automobile search harmless error. —

Assuming the search of an automobile the next morning at the city shops without first obtaining a search warrant was improper and that the items obtained therefrom were improperly admitted into evidence, the error was harmless beyond a reasonable doubt where such items were merely cumulative to the other evidence and defendants would have been convicted absent such evidence. Neilson v. State, 599 P.2d 1326,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 447

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 444 U.S. 1079, 100 S. Ct. 1031, 62 L. Ed. 2d 763, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 755 (U.S. 1980).

Evidence obtained as result of canine sniff. —

The district court erred in suppressing evidence obtained as a result of the “canine sniff” of the respondents' vehicle; the initial stop was lawful and was followed by a minimally intrusive detention of the vehicle and the respondents on a reasonably articulable suspicion premised upon objective facts indicating that the respondents' vehicle contained contraband. State v. Welch, 873 P.2d 601,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 56

(Wyo. 1994), reh'g denied,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 65

(Wyo. May 25, 1994), reh'g denied,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 67

(Wyo. May 25, 1994).

Denial of defendants'
motion to suppress was proper because Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

31-5-210

prohibited following another vehicle more closely, the trooper testified that he saw defendants following a truck at less than one vehicle length behind, and there was nothing in the record warranting a conclusion that the district court's credibility determination or finding of probable cause was clearly erroneous or contrary to law. The totality of the circumstances was further sufficient to support the conclusion that the trooper had reasonable suspicion that defendants were transporting controlled substances due to a drug dog sniff; thus, questioning them about matters outside the scope of the traffic violation was reasonable and provided probable cause for the search.
Phelps v. State, 2012 WY 87, 278 P.3d 1148,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 92

(Wyo. 2012), overruled in part, Allgier v. State, 2015 WY 137, 358 P.3d 1271,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 2015).

Since the
dog sniff occurred during a traffic stop based on a truck's missing
license plate and was conducted while an officer attempted to determine
whether the vehicle was stolen, and thus did not impermissibly extend
the stop, it was constitutionally permissible Engdahl v. State, 2014 WY 76, 327 P.3d 114,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 2014).

Fruit of the poisonous tree. —

Motion to suppress was properly denied in a drug case because, although all evidence directly related to an expired wiretap was excluded, a traffic stop and pat-down search were sufficiently separate to obviate the use of the exclusionary rule; an officer noticed that defendant had invalid tags while she was leaving a location where a drug transaction supposedly took place and subsequently arrested her on an suspended license.
Hall v. State, 2007 WY 138, 166 P.3d 875,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 2007).

Removal of automobile from scene requires justification. —

There must be some justification for the removal of the automobile from the scene of the stop, such as the fact that defendants were apprehended in the early evening hours and this may have rendered a careful search impractical and unsafe for the police officers. Neilson v. State, 599 P.2d 1326,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 447

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 444 U.S. 1079, 100 S. Ct. 1031, 62 L. Ed. 2d 763, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 755 (U.S. 1980).

Exigencies of situation determine whether warrantless search by police or firemen is permissible. —

Shaffer v. State, 640 P.2d 88,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 297

(Wyo. 1982).

Emergency assistance exception. —

Where officers received an urgent, garbled radio transmission at 4:30 a.m. from defendant's wife, an emergency medical technician (EMT), and went to their home to locate the EMT where they found a system for growing mushrooms in a bedroom, the search of the home was constitutional because the emergency assistance exception applied since the officers were acting reasonably when they investigated the possible emergency and properly limited their efforts to determining whether anyone was in need of assistance rather than investigating a crime.
Moulton v. State, 2006 WY 152, 148 P.3d 38,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 169

(Wyo. 2006).

And if warrantless entry constitutional, seizure of evidence afterwards constitutional. —

Officials need no warrant to remain in a building for a reasonable time to investigate the cause of a blaze after it has been extinguished. And if the warrantless entry to put out the fire and determine its cause is constitutional, the warrantless seizure of evidence while inspecting the premises for these purposes is also constitutional. Shaffer v. State, 640 P.2d 88,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 297

(Wyo. 1982).

Warrantless search. —

A warrantless search will not be held illegal when consent is obtained from a person who the police reasonably believe possesses authority to provide such consent. Gehnert v. State, 956 P.2d 359,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 51

(Wyo. 1998).

Exigent circumstances. —

The district court did not err in denying defendants' motion to suppress by finding the State had sustained its burden of proving that the forcible entry into defendants' home was justified under the exigent circumstances exception to the search warrant requirement of the constitution where officers smelled marijuana on one of the defendant's person and also emanating from the residence. It was reasonable for the deputies to suspect that once the occupants were aware of the officers' presence, there was a possibility that any evidence of contraband would be destroyed. Rideout v. State, 2005 WY 141, 122 P.3d 201,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 167

(Wyo. 2005).

Consent to chemical testing. —

District court properly dismissed, for lack of a justiciable controversy, a driver’s request for a declaration that the state constitution precluded a law enforcement officer from statutorily deeming the driver’s consent to chemical testing because, while the loss of driving privileges was a genuine, tangible, and existing interest, the officer did not “deem” the driver’s consent to breath testing, rather the driver “agreed” to take the test, therefore, a declaration would have no effect on the admissibility of the breath sample that sustained the suspension of the driver’s license, the district court lacked the jurisdiction to consider the driver’s request for declaratory relief, and mootness was not the basis for the dismissal. Leavitt v. Wyo. DOT, 2017 WY 149, 406 P.3d 1266,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2017).

Consent to search. —

In order to show consent to search without warrant which would otherwise be illegal, testimony must show that the consent was really voluntary with a desire to invite search, and not merely to avoid resistance. Tobin v. State, 36 Wyo. 368, 255 P. 788,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 1927).

Consent of a landlord or hotel or motel manager would not be sufficient to justify an officer to make a search of a tenant's premises without a warrant. Goddard v. State, 481 P.2d 343,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 199

(Wyo. 1971).

The issue of the voluntariness of the consent to a police search may be properly resolved by a preponderance of the evidence standard. Parkhurst v. State, 628 P.2d 1369,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 347

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 454 U.S. 899, 102 S. Ct. 402, 70 L. Ed. 2d 216, 1981 U.S. LEXIS 3986 (U.S. 1981).

Motion to suppress evidence seized as a result of the State's search of defendant's duffel bag was properly denied, where, prior to trial, defendant had denied ownership of the bag and the officers who conducted the search reasonably believed that the owners of the property where the duffel bag was found had authority to consent to a search of their home and its contents. Andrews v. State, 2002 WY 28, 40 P.3d 708,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 2002).

Consent to search was voluntary where the driver of the van was told he was free to go, and
he extended the interaction between himself and the trooper by asking a question about the warning ticket. The driver testified at the suppression hearing that the trooper released him before requesting consent to search, that the trooper was easy-going and non-threatening, and that he was not coerced or intimidated into giving consent.
Marquez-Guitierrez v. State, 2007 WY 155, 167 P.3d 1232,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 166

(Wyo. 2007).

Consent to search automobile. —

Evidence seized from defendant's vehicle was admissible where, following routine traffic stop, defendant engaged in casual conversation with police officer and voluntarily gave officer permission to search his car. Burgos-Seberos v. State, 969 P.2d 1131,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1998).

Consent to further questioning was voluntary. —

Denial of defendant's motion to suppress and his conviction for felony possession of marijuana were appropriate because defendant's consent to further questioning was voluntary; defendant was advised that he was free to leave and that he was not required to consent to further questioning.
Seymour v. State, 2008 WY 61, 185 P.3d 671,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2008).

Giving of

Miranda

warnings is not prerequisite to obtaining consent to search:

However, that a person is being held in custody and that the state failed to give the warnings required by

Miranda

to that person are factors to be considered on the issue of voluntariness. Stamper v. State, 662 P.2d 82,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 301

(Wyo. 1983).

Factors to be considered in determining voluntariness of consent to search. —

See Stamper v. State, 662 P.2d 82,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 301

(Wyo. 1983).

Trial court properly ruled that consent to search of van was voluntary.

Three police officers testified that the defendant, who was driving the van, consented to the search, while the defendant merely said that he was shocked and scared and didn't remember saying anything. Wilde v. State, 706 P.2d 251,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 551

(Wyo. 1985).

Search pursuant to admission gained unlawfully is illegal. —

A search made pursuant to an admission gained unlawfully by stealth, force or coercion is illegal. Wiggin v. State, 28 Wyo. 480, 206 P. 373,

1922 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1922).

Objects in plain view. —

Objects falling into the plain view of an officer, who has a right to be where he is, are subject to seizure and may be introduced in evidence.
Alcala v. State, 487 P.2d 448,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 233

(Wyo. 1971), cert. denied, 405 U.S. 997, 92 S. Ct. 1259, 31 L. Ed. 2d 466, 1972 U.S. LEXIS 3358 (1972);
McCutcheon v. State, 604 P.2d 537,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 500

(Wyo. 1979);
Jessee v. State, 640 P.2d 56,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1982), reh'g denied, 643 P.2d 681,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 344

(Wyo. 1982), overruled, Jones v. State, 902 P.2d 686,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1995).

Given a lawful search, some things may be seized in connection therewith which are not particularly described in the search warrant. Valerio v. State, 542 P.2d 875,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 176

(Wyo. 1975).

Testimony at suppression hearing by officer who was not at the scene of defendant's arrest pursuant to an arrest warrant executed with a search warrant did not establish the facts necessary to support admissibility of any items of evidence under the plain view doctrine and could not salvage the defective search warrant. Hixson v. State, 2001 WY 99, 33 P.3d 154,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2001).

When police officer followed an individual into defendant's home, and saw loose marijuana and drug paraphernalia on the table and saw defendant placing marijuana in a pipe and passing it, the evidence was in plain view, and the initial, warrantless entry of the home was justified given the exigent circumstances. Hughes v. State, 2003 WY 35, 65 P.3d 378,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 2003).

When police officer followed an individual into defendant's home, and saw loose marijuana and drug paraphernalia on the table and saw defendant placing marijuana in a pipe and passing it, the evidence was in plain view, and the initial, warrantless entry of the home was justified given the exigent circumstances. Hughes v. State, 2003 WY 35, 65 P.3d 378,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 2003).

Requirements for seizure of evidence in plain view are:

(1) the officers' presence must be proper; (2) the items observed must appear to the officer to be possible evidence; and (3) the “plain view” doctrine is applicable only to the inadvertent discovery of incriminating evidence. Kish v. State, 642 P.2d 453,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 316

(Wyo. 1982).

The plain-view doctrine is applied when a police officer is not searching for evidence against the accused but nonetheless inadvertently comes across an incriminating object. Jessee v. State, 640 P.2d 56,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1982), reh'g denied, 643 P.2d 681,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 344

(Wyo. 1982), overruled, Jones v. State, 902 P.2d 686,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1995).

Plain-view doctrine requires lawful initial intrusion. —

The condition precedent to reliance upon the plain-view doctrine as grounds for a warrantless seizure is that the initial intrusion which brings the police within plain view of such an article is itself lawful. McCutcheon v. State, 638 P.2d 650,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 281

(Wyo. 1982).

Officers were not entitled to continue search after finding item identified in warrant,

and thus they were not lawfully on premises when other items came into view, and remainder of seized items should have been suppressed. Taylor v. State, 7 P.3d 15,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 2000).

Plain view alone is not enough to justify warrantless seizure of evidence;

exigent circumstances must also be present. Jessee v. State, 640 P.2d 56,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1982), reh'g denied, 643 P.2d 681,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 344

(Wyo. 1982), overruled, Jones v. State, 902 P.2d 686,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1995).

Defendant's rights were not violated when sheriff's investigators retrieved boots from property room

at a county detention center without a search warrant, after he was jailed, in order to conduct experiments on them. His boots were legally seized when he was jailed, and the outsides of his boots were in plain view when he was arrested. The officers who seized his boots later on had a reasonable basis for wanting to compare the soles of the boots with scuff marks on the wall near the scene of the crime. Marquez v. State, 754 P.2d 705,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 55

(Wyo. 1988).

Search and seizure of trash and garbage cans. —

See Croker v. State, 477 P.2d 122,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 1970).

Procurement of telephone records not “search.” —

Police agent's procurement of defendant's telephone records, including those linking his name to his unlisted telephone number, did not constitute a “search” invading a “legitimate expectation of privacy” sufficient to demonstrate an invasion of defendant's constitutional rights. Any person using a telephone, whether on legitimate business or otherwise, assumes a risk that the telephone can, and will, reveal the numbers that he dials. Saldana v. State, 846 P.2d 604,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. Feb. 24, 1993).

In order to issue search warrant, judge or magistrate must have “substantial basis”

for concluding that probable cause exists. Davis v. State, 859 P.2d 89,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1993).

“Probable cause.” —

Existence of probable cause authorizing issuance of search warrant is judicial question which cannot be determined by prosecuting attorney or prohibition commissioner. State v. Peterson, 27 Wyo. 185, 194 P. 342,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1920).

The determination of probable cause must rest upon the factual showing in each case. Smith v. State, 557 P.2d 130,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1976).

Even though a warrant may be issued only upon a finding of probable cause, the term means something less than evidence which would justify condemnation, and such finding may rest upon evidence which is not legally competent in a criminal trial. Croker v. State, 477 P.2d 122,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 1970); McCutcheon v. State, 604 P.2d 537,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 500

(Wyo. 1979).

A finding of probable cause by the justice of the peace can be satisfied by hearsay information providing the affidavit sets forth sufficient of the underlying circumstances necessary to enable the magistrate independently to judge the validity of the informant's conclusion as to the existence of evidence. Croker v. State, 477 P.2d 122,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 1970).

An information verified on information and belief by the prosecuting attorney was sufficient to show probable cause, where the prosecuting attorney also filed an affidavit stating in positive terms facts showing probable cause. State v. Bruner, 78 Wyo. 111, 319 P.2d 863,

1958 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1958). See also State v. Sureties of Krohne, 4 Wyo. 347, 34 P. 3,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1893).

Results of examinations made by the department of agriculture are admissible under the provisions of §

1-12-301

in the trial of a case, if relevant and upon the laying of a proper foundation. That being true, it can scarcely be said that the department's certified reports were not reliable for the purpose of determining probable cause for the purpose of obtaining a warrant, and certainly they are relevant to affiant's belief that defendant was a user and possessor of marijuana. Croker v. State, 477 P.2d 122,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 1970). See also Rules 902, 1005, 1102, W.R.E.

Probable cause exists to support an arrest warrant if the proof is sufficient to cause a person to conscientiously entertain a reasonable belief that a public offense has been committed in which the accused participated.
Kimbley v. Green River, 663 P.2d 871,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 317

(Wyo. 1983).

Test for determining existence of probable cause

is whether a factual situation is sufficient to warrant a reasonably cautious or prudent man to believe that a crime was being committed or that one had been committed; the issuing officer must weigh and consider all of the circumstances surrounding the issuance of a search warrant. Bonsness v. State, 672 P.2d 1291,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 390

(Wyo. 1983).

Affidavit for search warrant must be strictly construed,

especially when right of security against search of dwelling is in question. State v. Scott, 41 Wyo. 438, 286 P. 390,

1930 Wyo. LEXIS 20

(Wyo. 1930).

Affidavits supporting warrants to include facts, not bare conclusions. —

An affidavit in support of a search warrant must include more than bare conclusions of the affiant: Facts which lead the affiant to believe that a warrant is justified must be presented in the affidavit. Bonsness v. State, 672 P.2d 1291,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 390

(Wyo. 1983).

But interpreted in realistic fashion. —

Affidavits for a warrant must be tested and interpreted by magistrates and courts in a common sense and realistic fashion. Croker v. State, 477 P.2d 122,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 1970); McCutcheon v. State, 604 P.2d 537,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 500

(Wyo. 1979).

And technical requirements of elaborate specificity once exacted under common-law pleadings have no proper place

in the area of issuing warrants. A grudging or negative attitude by reviewing courts toward warrants will tend to discourage police officers from submitting their evidence to a judicial officer before acting. This is not to say that probable cause can be made out by affidavits which are purely conclusory, stating only the affiant's or an informer's belief that probable cause exists without detailing any of the underlying circumstances upon which that belief is based. Croker v. State, 477 P.2d 122,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 1970); McCutcheon v. State, 604 P.2d 537,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 500

(Wyo. 1979).

Affidavits upon which search warrants are based are to be tested by much less rigorous standards than those governing admissibility of evidence and issuing magistrates are not to be confined by niggardly limitations. Smith v. State, 557 P.2d 130,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1976).

District court erred in denying defendant's motion to suppress the results of his blood alcohol concentration test because the affidavit in support of the search warrant was deficient since it contained bare conclusions; the judge issuing the warrant was not provided with facts supporting the officer's conclusion that defendant was driving when the warrant was issued, and some of the underlying factual information supporting that conclusion was essential to support issuance of the warrant.
Snell v. State, 2014 WY 46, 322 P.3d 38,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2014).

Good faith exception to exclusionary rule. —

Supreme court had no facts to demonstrate that the case was an appropriate one to consider whether a good faith exception to the exclusionary rule would become part of the Wyoming Constitution's protections against unreasonable search and seizure because a determination of whether the good faith exception applied would require, inter alia, the testimony of the officer executing the affidavit, but the officer did not testify at the suppression hearing.
Snell v. State, 2014 WY 46, 322 P.3d 38,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2014).

Sufficiency of description. —

Under this section, providing that no search warrant shall issue but upon probable cause supported by affidavit particularly describing the thing to be seized, a designation of the property to be searched for as intoxicating liquor, without describing the kind or quantity, is insufficient. State v. Peterson, 27 Wyo. 185, 194 P. 342,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1920).

In a prosecution for felony possession of marijuana, not enough information justified the sweeping assertions made by the affiant and relied upon by the judge in issuing a search warrant against defendant, and no reasonable attorney would have foregone the opportunity to test the search warrant via a motion to suppress; as such, defendant was clearly prejudiced by counsel's failure in that regard and received ineffective assistance of counsel. Page v. State, 2003 WY 23, 63 P.3d 904,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 25

(Wyo. 2003).

Affidavit in support of a search warrant contained sufficient information from which a magistrate could make an independent decision concerning the credibility of a confidential informant; the affidavit reflected the informant's firsthand knowledge of criminal activity, which the informant described with particularity, and the informant's observations were made in close temporal proximity to the date of an interview with a police officer and execution of the warrant.
In re T.J.S. v. State, 2005 WY 68, 113 P.3d 1054,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 2005).

Affidavit need not particularly describe place searched. —

There is no requirement that the affidavit supporting a warrant particularly describe the place to be searched, only the warrant itself must particularly describe the place to be searched. Bland v. State, 803 P.2d 856,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 1990).

A bare conclusion that an accused is known to the police as a user and possessor of marijuana

standing alone is of no probative value in deciding to issue a search warrant. Croker v. State, 477 P.2d 122,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 1970).

Information obtained by a fellow officer engaged in a common investigation is a reliable basis

for a warrant applied for by one of their number. Croker v. State, 477 P.2d 122,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 206

(Wyo. 1970).

Hearing required when affidavit contains false statements. —

Both the United States and the Wyoming constitutional provisions require a hearing when a defendant offers proof that false statements were included in the affidavit to support a search warrant, knowingly and intentionally or with reckless disregard for the truth; however, the defendant must show these statements were necessary to a finding of probable cause. Davis v. State, 859 P.2d 89,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 1993).

Delay in use or execution of arrest warrant does not make it invalid;

there are no constitutional requirements dictating that an arrest warrant be executed at the earliest opportunity.
Kimbley v. Green River, 663 P.2d 871,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 317

(Wyo. 1983).

Warrant provides general immunity from liability to law enforcement officers. —

The issuance of a warrant valid on its face provides law enforcement officers qualified immunity from liability for tortious conduct as a matter of public policy in the interests of an effective system of law enforcement: There are exceptions caused by a lack of good faith and unreasonable action by officers.
Kimbley v. Green River, 663 P.2d 871,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 317

(Wyo. 1983).

Investigatory stop and transportation did not constitute arrest. —

Transporting defendant across the street to continue an investigative stop, as a hostile crowd confronted the officers, did not transform a Terry stop into an arrest, requiring probable cause, and the officers did not have to choose between continuing the investigation at the risk of personal safety or abandoning the investigation; in addition, a police agent feared for another officer's safety when approaching defendant with a drawn gun, and the display of force was not unreasonable, and did not transform the otherwise valid Terry stop into an arrest. Eckenrod v. State, 2003 WY 51, 67 P.3d 635,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 63

(Wyo. 2003).

Elements of arrest. —

To effect an arrest there must be actual or constructive seizure or detention of the person arrested, or his voluntary submission to custody, and the restraint must be under real or pretended legal authority. Neilson v. State, 599 P.2d 1326,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 447

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 444 U.S. 1079, 100 S. Ct. 1031, 62 L. Ed. 2d 763, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 755 (U.S. 1980).

Facts constituting arrest. —

Defendants were “arrested” when a police officer ordered them from a vehicle, moved them to the rear of it, displayed a weapon and the defendants would have been physically restrained if they had attempted to leave the scene or to enter the automobile. Neilson v. State, 599 P.2d 1326,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 447

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 444 U.S. 1079, 100 S. Ct. 1031, 62 L. Ed. 2d 763, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 755 (U.S. 1980).

Fact of arrest is not controlled by subjective judgment of police officers involved.

Neilson v. State, 599 P.2d 1326,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 447

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 444 U.S. 1079, 100 S. Ct. 1031, 62 L. Ed. 2d 763, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 755 (U.S. 1980).

When warrantless arrest constitutional. —

A peace officer may constitutionally arrest a person without a warrant if, at the moment the arrest is made, he has probable cause to believe that a crime had been committed by the person to be arrested or he has reasonable grounds to believe that a crime is being committed in his presence by the person to be arrested. Neilson v. State, 599 P.2d 1326,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 447

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 444 U.S. 1079, 100 S. Ct. 1031, 62 L. Ed. 2d 763, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 755 (U.S. 1980).

Determination of probable cause to arrest without warrant

depends upon whether the facts and circumstances within the peace officer's knowledge and of which he has reasonably trustworthy information were sufficient to warrant a reasonably cautious or prudent man to believe that the person arrested has committed or is committing an offense. Neilson v. State, 599 P.2d 1326,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 447

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 444 U.S. 1079, 100 S. Ct. 1031, 62 L. Ed. 2d 763, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 755 (U.S. 1980).

An arresting officer may use information he gathers to bolster a tip by an informant to the point that there exists probable cause for arrest, if the information gathered by the officer is corroborative of the informant's tip; therefore, where the police made an arrest based upon the information that had come to them from an anonymous informant, and with the further corroboration of that information by the law enforcement officer both prior to and after the investigatory stop and the other information gained at that time, the police officers had the requisite probable cause for a warrantless arrest in accordance with §

7-2-103

.Goettl v. State, 842 P.2d 549,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 174

(Wyo. 1992).

Defendant's
warrantless arrest for driving while under the influence of alcohol,
which was made at a hospital by a patrol sergeant with a county sheriff's
department, was constitutional because it was based on information
gathered by a state trooper, who was investigating defendant's automobile
accident. Stowe v. State, 2014 WY 97, 331 P.3d 127,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2014).

Constitutionally sufficient showing of probable cause. —

See Guerra v. State, 897 P.2d 447,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 87

(Wyo. 1995).

Police officer had probable cause to arrest defendant for negligent homicide where

the officer knew that a traffic accident had occurred which resulted in the loss of life, eye witnesses on the scene indicated defendant was driving in an extremely erratic and hazardous manner, the roadway was clear and provided no explanation for the severity of the accident and the defendant reeked of alcohol. Van Order v. State, 600 P.2d 1056,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 463

(Wyo. 1979).

Arrest cannot be used as pretext to search for evidence of unrelated crime.

Where the defendant was arrested outside her home, and there was nothing in the record to support a reasonable belief that there might be other persons inside her home who posed a threat to the officers' safety, since the information gained through the surveillance of her home supported her assertions that her boyfriend was the only other person on the premises, and he had already stepped outside, a protective sweep of her home was not warranted. Brown v. State, 738 P.2d 1092,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 461

(Wyo. 1987).

Traffic stop as pretext. —

Officer personally observed defendant's traffic violation and had probable cause to initiate a traffic stop, regardless of whether the officer's primary motivation was to stop defendant's car to search for narcotics; the traffic stop did not violate Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 4 or the Fourth Amendment. Also, the scope, duration, and intensity of the seizure, after the initial stop, were not contested by defendant; accordingly, the trial court properly denied defendant's motion to suppress.
Fertig v. State, 2006 WY 148, 146 P.3d 492,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 2006).

Appellate inquiry limited to evidence in record. —

An appellate court's inquiry into whether or not an arrest is legal in a given case is restricted to an objective consideration of the evidence in the record. Neilson v. State, 599 P.2d 1326,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 447

(Wyo. 1979), cert. denied, 444 U.S. 1079, 100 S. Ct. 1031, 62 L. Ed. 2d 763, 1980 U.S. LEXIS 755 (U.S. 1980).

Violation of constitutional rights prerequisite for exclusionary rule. —

One seeking the imposition of the exclusionary rule must be claiming a violation of his own constitutional rights under this section. Parkhurst v. State, 628 P.2d 1369,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 347

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 454 U.S. 899, 102 S. Ct. 402, 70 L. Ed. 2d 216, 1981 U.S. LEXIS 3986 (U.S. 1981).

In defendant's drug case, defendant did not have standing to challenge the search because he did not have a reasonable expectation of privacy in a vehicle owned by someone else and because he disavowed ownership of the pencil box in which the evidence was found.
Dettloff v. State, 2007 WY 29, 152 P.3d 376,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2007).

As is expectation of privacy. —

Where the claim is that the police have improperly searched or seized something, the claimant must have had a legitimate expectation of privacy as to that thing. Factors to be considered in making this determination include: (1) the precautions taken in order to maintain one's privacy; (2) the likely intent of the drafters of the United States and Wyoming constitutions; (3) the property rights the claimant possessed in the invaded area; and (4) the legitimacy of the individual's possession of or presence in the property which was searched or seized. Parkhurst v. State, 628 P.2d 1369,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 347

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 454 U.S. 899, 102 S. Ct. 402, 70 L. Ed. 2d 216, 1981 U.S. LEXIS 3986 (U.S. 1981).

Defendant who rented basement apartment had no reasonable expectation of privacy as to areas used solely by his landlady, or as to machete he released to landlady's daughter during altercation. Beadles v. State, 984 P.2d 1083,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 108

(Wyo. 1999).

No right of privacy in criminal activity. —

“Participant monitoring” without a warrant or court order pursuant to Wyoming's Communication Interception Act, §

7-3-601

et seq. (now repealed), does not violate this section because the accused assumes the risk of disclosure by engaging in criminal activity with another, forfeiting the reasonable expectation of privacy which might otherwise sustain a constitutional challenge to the evidence. Almada v. State, 994 P.2d 299,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 192

(Wyo. 1999).

Exclusionary rule applies to state prosecutions. —

In
Mapp v. Ohio, 367 U.S. 643, 81 S. Ct. 1684, 6 L. Ed. 2d 1081, 1961 U.S. LEXIS 812, 84 A.L.R.2d 933 (1961), the United States supreme court held the exclusionary rule was applicable to state prosecutions.
Whiteley v. Warden, Wyoming State Penitentiary, 401 U.S. 560, 91 S. Ct. 1031, 28 L. Ed. 2d 306, 58 Ohio Op. 2d 434, 1971 U.S. LEXIS 65 (U.S. 1971), limited, Mayer v. Moeykens, 373 F. Supp. 649, 1973 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 12657 (D. Vt. 1973).

Everything becoming accessible to prosecution through improper search is inadmissible. —

If the initial search is held improper, not only the evidence obtained by such search but everything which becomes accessible to the prosecution by reason of the initial search would be inadmissible as “a fruit of the poisonous tree.” Goddard v. State, 481 P.2d 343,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 199

(Wyo. 1971).

Evidence sufficient to support seizure of goods. —

The evidence was found sufficient to support a finding that the goods in question appeared to police officers, admitted into the defendant's room, to be possible evidence of burglary. The seizure of the goods and their introduction into evidence at trial was therefore proper. Kish v. State, 642 P.2d 453,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 316

(Wyo. 1982).

Statute held not violative of section. —

Section

23-6-109

, giving game wardens the right to search without warrant automobiles for wildlife taken in violation of state law, does not violate this section. Gilkison v. State, 404 P.2d 755,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1965).

Preservation for review. —

Where defendant pled guilty to one count of possession of marijuana and one count of possession of methamphetamine while reserving the right to appeal, and his motion to suppress in the district court only cited to Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 4 and his argument at the suppression hearing focused exclusively on the Fourth Amendment, defendant did not properly raise the state constitutional argument in the district court and, consequently, the Supreme Court of Wyoming declined to consider his argument on appeal. Custer v. State, 2006 WY 72, 135 P.3d 620,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 2006).

Failure to present proper argument barred consideration. —

In a challenge to a search and seizure, defendant's failure to present proper argument supporting adequate and independent state grounds to apply Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 4, instead of the Fourth Amendment, prevented the appellate court from considering other than the federal constitutional principles at issue. Fender v. State, 2003 WY 96, 74 P.3d 1220,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2003).

Warrantless automobile searches. —

It was reasonable under Wyo. Const. art. I, § 4, to search defendant's car for evidence which might have served to sustain defendant's prosecution for violation of a protection order and/or that he might have been an imminent and serious danger to his victims because: (1) defendant was the subject of an order of protection under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 35-21-104(b); (2) defendant's victims went to a crisis intervention office because defendant was calling them repeatedly; (3) defendant and an occupant of defendant's car were seen driving by the crisis center by his victims, and this was reported to the police; (4) while the victims waited for the police to arrive at the crisis center, defendant and his companion drove by a second time; and (5) a police officer searched defendant's person incident to arresting him for violation of the order of protection; that the cursory search of the car's interior uncovered evidence of the possession with intent to deliver proscribed narcotics, rather than evidence of the violation of the protection order, did not negate the admissibility of that evidence.
Sam v. State, 2008 WY 25, 177 P.3d 1173,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 2008).

Applied

in

Raigosa v. State, 562 P.2d 1009,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 246

(Wyo. 1977); Ostrowski v. State, 665 P.2d 471,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 332

(Wyo. 1983); Southworth v. State, 913 P.2d 444,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1996); Nellis v. Wyoming DOT, 932 P.2d 741,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1997).

Quoted

in

Crouse v. State, 384 P.2d 321,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1963); State ex rel. Hopkinson v. District Court, 696 P.2d 54,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 455

(Wyo. 1985); Morgan v. State, 2004 WY 95, 95 P.3d 802,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 121

(2004).

Cited

in

State v. Sorenson, 34 Wyo. 90, 241 P. 705,

1925 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(1925); Osborn v. Shillinger, 861 F.2d 612,

1988 U.S. App. LEXIS 14834

(10th Cir. 1988); City of Laramie v. Hysong, 808 P.2d 199,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(Wyo. 1991); Wyoming Dep't of Emp. v. Patrick, 818 P.2d 54,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1991); Keehn ex rel. Keehn v. Town of Torrington, 834 P.2d 112,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 1992); Dickeson v. State, 843 P.2d 606,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 1992); McChesney v. State, 988 P.2d 1071,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 159

(Wyo. 1999); Bailey v. State, 12 P.3d 173,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 209

(Wyo. 2000); Lafond v. State, 2004 WY 51, 89 P.3d 324,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(2004); Vassar v. State, 2004 WY 125, 99 P.3d 987,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(2004); Garvin v. State, 2007 WY 190, 172 P.3d 725,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Dec. 6, 2007); State v. Deen, 2015 WY 5,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Jan. 8, 2015); Tingey v. State, 2017 WY 5, 387 P.3d 1170,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2017).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Search of Person Under Authority to Search Premises,” see 3 Wyo. L.J. 94.

For article, “Admissibility in the Federal Courts of Evidence Obtained by Eavesdropping Through the Use of Communications Devices,” see 7 Wyo. L.J. 89.

For note on authority of game wardens to search automobiles without a warrant, see 13 Wyo. L.J. 56 (1959).

For note, “Standing to Object to an Unlawful Search and Seizure,” see 15 Wyo. L.J. 218 (1961).
